Massachusetts, session 194th, H5483.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the general laws or any other general or special law to
the contrary, the Town of Williamstown may by ordinance prohibit the application of second
generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of Williamstown, including application of
such pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R. 10.00, except as
allowed by the Board of Health to remediate a public health condition.
of 1